Utah statutes.
72-10-212.   General provisions of law applicable in condemnation proceedings, issuing bonds, and levying taxes.

It is the intent and purpose of this part that all provisions herein relating to the issuance of bonds and the levying of taxes for airport purposes and the condemnation for airports and airport facilities shall be construed in accordance with general provisions of the law of this state governing the right and procedure of municipalities to condemn property, issue bonds, and levy taxes.

